Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-322
Telecommunications company, defined.

Telecommunications company means any natural person, firm, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or association providing telecommunications or telecommunications service for hire in Nebraska without regard to whether such company holds a certificate of convenience and necessity as a telecommunications common carrier or a permit as a telecommunications contract carrier from the commission.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 200;

Laws 2007, LB661, § 7.